Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3406
Genetic counseling intern, defined.

Genetic counseling intern
means a student enrolled in a genetic counseling program accredited by the
national genetic counseling board.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 6.